test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_kattoot_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kattoot - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     kattoot+V+Inf: kattoot
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: katton
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kattot
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kattoo
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kattoma
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kattotta
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kattothaan
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kattoin
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kattoit
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kattoi
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kattoima
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kattoitta
     kattoot+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kattothiin
     kattoot+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kattonu
     kattoot+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kattottu
     kattoot+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kattonheet
     kattoot+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kattoova
     kattoot+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kattoovat
     kattoot+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kattottava
     kattoot+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kattottavat

     kattoot+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: kattoisin
     kattoot+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: kattoisit
     kattoot+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kattois
     kattoot+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: kattoisimma
     kattoot+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: kattoisitta
     kattoot+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: kattottais
     kattoot+V+Pass+Cond: kattottais

     kattoot+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: katto
     kattoot+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kattokkaa
     
     kattoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: kattomassa
     kattoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: kattomasta
     kattoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: kattomhaan
     kattoot+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: kattomalla
     kattoot+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: kattomatta
